Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 16 COLORADO CHARITABLE SOLICITATIONS ACT
6-16-104.6. Paid solicitors - annual registration - filing of contracts - fees.

No person shall act as a paid solicitor without first complying with the requirements of this section.

Every paid solicitor shall register in accordance with subsection (3) of this section before soliciting contributions in this state.

Every contract between a paid solicitor and a charitable organization or sponsor for each solicitation campaign shall be in writing and shall be signed by an authorized official of the charitable organization or sponsor, who shall be a member of the organization's governing body, and by the paid solicitor if the paid solicitor is an individual or by the authorized contracting officer for the paid solicitor if the paid solicitor is not an individual. The paid solicitor shall provide a copy of the contract to the charitable organization prior to the performance of any material services under the contract and shall make a copy of the contract available to the secretary of state upon request. The contract shall contain all of the following provisions:

A statement of the charitable purpose for which the solicitation campaign is being conducted;

A statement of the respective obligations of the paid solicitor and the charitable organization;

A statement of the specified minimum percentage, if any, of the gross receipts from contributions that will be remitted to the charitable organization, or, if the solicitation involves the sale of goods, services, or tickets to a fundraising event, the specified minimum percentage, if any, of the purchase price that will be remitted to the charitable organization. Any stated percentage shall exclude any amount payable by the charitable organization as fundraising costs.

A statement of the specified percentage, if any, of gross revenue that constitutes the paid solicitor's compensation. If the paid solicitor's compensation is not contingent upon the number of contributions or the amount received, the paid solicitor's compensation shall be expressed as a reasonable estimate of the percentage of gross revenue, and the contract shall clearly disclose the assumptions upon which such estimate is based. The stated assumptions shall be based upon all the relevant facts known to the paid solicitor regarding the solicitation to be conducted.

The effective and termination dates of the contract.

Applications for registration or renewal of registration must be submitted on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, signed and affirmed under penalty of perjury as defined in section 18-8-503, and must include the following information:

The address and telephone number of the principal place of business of the applicant and the address and telephone number of any office located in this state if the principal place of business is located outside the state;

The form of the applicant's business and, if the applicant is not an individual, the place and date when the applicant was incorporated or otherwise legally established;

The name, address, and telephone number of the person that has custody of the applicant's financial records;

If the applicant is not an individual, the names and addresses of the owners, officers, and executive personnel of the applicant;

The names of all persons in charge of any solicitation activity conducted in this state by the applicant or on the applicant's behalf;

Whether the applicant, any person with a controlling interest in the applicant, or any of the applicant's owners, officers, directors, trustees, employees, or agents has, within the immediately preceding five years, been convicted of, found guilty of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to, been adjudicated a juvenile violator of, or been incarcerated for any felony involving fraud, theft, larceny, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of property or any crime arising from the conduct of a solicitation for a charitable organization or sponsor, under the laws of this or any other state or of the United States, and if so, the name of such person, the nature of the offense, the date of the offense, the court having jurisdiction in the case, the date of conviction or other disposition, and the disposition of the offense;

Whether the applicant or any of its owners, officers, directors, trustees, or employees have been enjoined from violating any law relating to a charitable solicitation and, if so, the name of such person, the date of the injunction, and the court issuing the injunction;

Whether the applicant is registered with or otherwise authorized by any other state to act as a paid solicitor;

Whether the applicant has had such registration or authority denied, suspended, revoked, or enjoined by any court or other governmental authority in this state or another state; and

Whether the applicant or any officer, director, or employee of the applicant serves on the board of directors of a charitable organization, directs the operations of a charitable organization, or otherwise has a financial interest in a charitable organization for which the applicant solicits contributions. If this relationship exists between the applicant and the charitable organization, the application must include a statement that the relationship meets the standards set forth in section 7-128-501 (3), C.R.S., regarding conflict of interest transactions.

(3.5) (a) Before any paid solicitor is registered, the applicant shall procure and file with the secretary of state evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101, C.R.S., or a good and sufficient bond in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars issued by a corporate surety duly licensed to do business within the state, approved as to form by the attorney general of the state, and conditioned that the applicant shall perform in good faith as a paid solicitor without fraud or fraudulent representation and without the violation of any provision of this article.

No corporate surety is required to make any payment to any person claiming a bond issued under this subsection (3.5) until a final determination of fraud or fraudulent representation has been made by the secretary of state or by a court of competent jurisdiction.

All bonds required under this section must be renewed annually at the same time as the bondholder's license is renewed. Renewal of the bond may be done through a continuation certificate issued by the surety.

The application for registration or for renewal shall be accompanied by the fee established pursuant to subsection (12) of this section. A paid solicitor that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company may register for and pay a single fee on behalf of all its partners, members, officers, directors, agents, and employees. In such case, the names and street addresses of all the partners, members, officers, directors, employees, and agents of the paid solicitor and all other persons with whom the paid solicitor has contracted to work under its direction shall be listed in the application or furnished to the secretary of state within five days after the date of employment or contractual arrangement.

Each registration is valid for a period of one year and may be renewed, on or before the anniversary date, for an additional one-year period upon application to the secretary of state and payment of the registration fee and any assessed fines. Any material changes to the information contained in the application for registration must be reported in writing to the secretary of state within thirty days.

The secretary of state shall examine each registration to determine whether the applicable requirements of this section are satisfied. The secretary of state shall notify the applicant within ten days after receipt of its application of any deficiencies therein, otherwise the application shall be deemed approved as filed. The secretary of state shall issue each approved applicant a registration number.

No later than fifteen days before the commencement of a solicitation campaign, the paid solicitor shall file with the secretary of state a completed solicitation notice, on forms prescribed by the secretary of state, containing the following information:

A summary of the governing contract, as specified in subsection (2) of this section;

The full legal name and address of the paid solicitor who will be conducting the solicitation campaign and the full legal name and address of each person responsible for directing and supervising the conduct of the campaign;

A statement, in accordance with section 6-16-111 (1)(f) and (1)(g), of the nature of the intended solicitation campaign, including the means of communication to be used in the campaign, the projected commencement and conclusion dates of the campaign, and a description of any event the campaign will lead up to;

A full and fair statement, in accordance with section 6-16-111 (1)(f) and (1)(g), of the charitable purpose for which the solicitation campaign is being carried out;

Each location and telephone number, if applicable, from which the solicitation is to be conducted;

A statement as to whether the paid solicitor will at any time have custody of contributions;

The account number and location of each bank account where receipts from the campaign are to be deposited;

The address where records and accounting concerning the solicitation campaign are being kept; and

A certification statement, signed and affirmed under penalty of perjury as defined in section 18-8-503 by an officer of the charitable organization on the behalf of whom the solicitation campaign is to occur, stating that the solicitation notice and accompanying material are true and complete to the best of his or her knowledge.

If a paid solicitor will have custody of any monetary contribution received during a solicitation campaign, each such contribution must be deposited within two business days after its receipt in an account at a bank or other federally insured financial institution. The account must be in the name of the charitable organization with whom the paid solicitor has contracted, and the charitable organization must have sole control over all withdrawals from the account.

Within ninety days after a solicitation campaign has been concluded, and on the anniversary of the commencement of a solicitation campaign lasting more than one year, the paid solicitor shall provide to the charitable organization and file with the secretary of state a financial report of the campaign, including gross proceeds and an itemization of all expenses or disbursements for any purpose. The report must be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and must be signed and affirmed under penalty of perjury as defined in section 18-8-503 by the paid solicitor, or, if the paid solicitor is not an individual, by an authorized official of the paid solicitor, and by an authorized official of the charitable organization. The persons signing the report shall certify that the financial report is true and complete to the best of their knowledge.

No person may act as a paid solicitor and no paid solicitor required to be registered under this section shall knowingly employ any person as an officer, trustee, director, or employee if such person, within the immediately preceding five years, has been convicted of, found guilty of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to, been adjudicated a juvenile violator of, or been incarcerated for any felony involving fraud, theft, larceny, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of property or any crime arising from the conduct of a solicitation for a charitable organization or sponsor, under the laws of this or any other state or of the United States, or has been enjoined within the immediately preceding five years under the laws of this or any other state or of the United States from engaging in deceptive conduct relating to charitable solicitations.

Information filed pursuant to this section, except for residential addresses and telephone numbers of individuals and account numbers at banks or other financial institutions, is a public record for purposes of the public records law, part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Filing fees for the annual registration of a paid solicitor, amendments thereto, solicitation notices, and financial reports shall be established by the secretary of state in amounts that reflects the costs of the secretary of state in administering the provisions of this article. All such fees collected shall be deposited in the department of state cash fund created in section 24-21-104 (3)(b), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 1239, § 3, effective May 9, 2002.

L. 2003:

IP(2) amended, p. 2497, § 4, effective June 5.

L. 2005:

IP(2) amended, p. 1288, § 4, effective June 3.

L. 2012:

(8) amended, (HB 12-1236), ch. 133, p. 458, § 3, effective January 1, 2013.

L. 2014:

(11) amended, (HB 14-1206), ch. 118, p. 421, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2016:

(3)(h) and (3)(i) amended and (3)(j) and (3.5) added, (HB 16-1129), ch. 262, p. 1076, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP(3), (5), (7)(i), and (9) amended, (HB 17-1158), ch. 160, p. 594, § 3, effective October 1, 2018.

6-16-105. Written confirmation of contribution - disclosures.

A paid solicitor who makes an oral solicitation by telephone, door-to-door, or otherwise must furnish to each contributor, prior to collecting or attempting to collect any contribution, a written confirmation of the expected contribution, which confirmation shall contain the following information clearly and conspicuously:

The full legal name, address, telephone number, and registration number of the employer of the individual paid solicitor who directly communicated with the contributor;

A disclosure that the contribution is not tax-deductible, if such disclosure is applicable, or, if the solicitor maintains that the contribution is tax-deductible in whole or in part, the portion of the contribution that the solicitor maintains is tax-deductible;

A disclosure in capital letters of no less than ten-point, bold-faced type identifying the paid solicitor as a paid solicitor and containing the statement: "Registration by the secretary of state is not an endorsement of either the paid solicitor or the organization or cause the solicitor represents.";

The address and telephone number of the telephone room or other location from which the solicitation has been or is being conducted if such information is different than that which is provided pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1); except that this information is not required to be provided if telephone solicitations are being conducted from more than one location and from the residences of the individual paid solicitor;

The name, address, telephone number, and registration number of any charitable organization connected with the solicitation or any organization the name or symbol of which has been used in aid of or in the course of such solicitation;

The amount of any expected monetary contribution;

The name and address of the contributor, as well as the date of the individual solicitation, or spaces where this information may be filled in by the contributor;

A statement that Colorado residents may obtain copies of registration and financial documents from the office of the secretary of state, with the website address for obtaining such documents from the secretary of state.

If the contributor is absent when the contribution is to be collected, the paid solicitor may comply with subsection (1) of this section by furnishing the written confirmation in a manner previously agreed upon between said solicitor and the contributor.

Except for the amount of the expected contribution, a written solicitation shall contain the same information as is required in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article added, p. 353, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section R&RE, p. 365, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (1)(e) amended and (1)(h) added, p. 1246, § 4, effective May 9, 2002.

L. 2014:

IP(1) and (1)(h) amended, (HB 14-1206), ch. 118, p. 421, § 4, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

For discussion of language in the North Carolina Charitable Solicitations Act relating to the disclosure of information concerning the amount of gross receipts turned over to charities, a requirement of this section prior to the 1989 amendment, see Riley v. National Federation of the Blind of North Carolina, 487 U.S. 781, 108 S. Ct. 2667, 101 L. Ed. 2d 669 (1988).

6-16-105.3. Solicitations by telephone.

In addition to any other disclosure required for solicitations by telephone under section

6-16-105

, a paid solicitor who makes an oral solicitation to any person by a telephone call received in Colorado regarding a charitable contribution shall make the following oral disclosures as part of the telephone solicitation:

A statement that the person soliciting the charitable contribution by telephone is paid to make such solicitation;

The name of the telemarketing company that employs the paid solicitor;

The name and telephone number of the charitable organization on whose behalf the paid solicitor is making the solicitation;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2001, p. 1247, § 5, effective May 9, 2002.)

The first name and surname of the paid solicitor, which must be given in the opening greeting;

A statement, which must be made prior to the person's agreement to make a contribution, that the charitable contribution is not tax deductible, if such is the case;

Upon request by a person from whom a charitable contribution is sought, the percentage of the contribution that will be paid to the charitable organization as a result of such person's contribution; and

Upon request by a person from whom a charitable contribution is sought, the registration numbers of the charitable organization and the paid solicitor.

A volunteer as defined in section 6-16-103 (12) who makes an oral solicitation to any person by a telephone call received in Colorado regarding a charitable contribution is subject to the disclosure required under paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as restricting, superseding, abrogating, or contravening any state or federal law or regulation regarding charitable solicitations.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 404, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(d) amended and (1)(g) added, p. 1247, § 5, effective May 9, 2002.

L. 2012:

IP(1) and (1)(e) amended and (1)(d.5) added, (HB 12-1236), ch. 133, p. 458, § 4, effective January 1, 2013.

6-16-105.5. Solicitations by container - disclosures.

No person or charitable organization, or agent of a person or charitable organization, whether paid or not paid, shall place any container offering a product for sale or distribution in a public place for solicitation purposes unless the container is affixed with a disclosure label conspicuously displaying the information set forth in subsection (2) of this section in a typed or printed clearly legible form.

A person other than an organization that has received a determination that it is exempt under section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, who places a container in a public place for solicitation purposes and who does not direct all of the items placed in the container to a charitable purpose or, if the items are sold, does not direct all proceeds of such sale to a charitable purpose, shall affix to the container a disclosure label that clearly and conspicuously displays the following legend:

This paragraph (b) shall not apply to containers used exclusively for the collection of used paper, cardboard, motor oil, bottles, cans, or other containers or materials for recycling or waste diversion purposes.

The disclosure label required pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section shall state the following:

The percentage of annual contributions that are paid to any person or organization to maintain, service, or collect the contributions deposited in all the containers used by the person or charitable organization;

The percentage of annual contributions that are paid to the charitable organization specified on the container;

Whether the person maintaining, servicing, or collecting the contributions deposited in the container is a volunteer or is paid for the services.

For purposes of this section, "container" means a box, carton, package, receptacle, canister, jar, dispenser, or machine.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as restricting, superseding, abrogating, or contravening any state or federal law or regulation regarding charitable solicitations.

DONATED ITEMS WILL BE SOLD FOR PROFIT
The value of items placed in this container is NOT tax-deductible.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 291, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) and IP(2) amended, (HB 09-1052), ch. 50, p. 178, § 1, effective August 5.

6-16-106. Contributor's right to cancel.

In addition to any right otherwise provided by law with respect to the binding nature of an agreement or pledge to make a charitable contribution, a contributor shall have the right to cancel his agreement or pledge to contribute as follows:

With respect to a solicitation in which the paid solicitor knowingly fails to comply with this article, at any time; or

Until 12 midnight of the third business day, or with respect to a nonmonetary contribution, until 12 midnight of the first business day after the day on which the contributor receives a written confirmation of contribution pursuant to section 6-16-105.

Cancellation occurs when the contributor gives written or oral notice of the cancellation to the paid solicitor at the address or telephone number stated in the written confirmation of contribution.

Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, is given at the time it is properly addressed and deposited in a mail box with proper postage.

A particular form shall not be required for a notice of cancellation, and such notice shall be sufficient if it indicates the intention of the contributor to cancel his pledge to contribute.

Within ten days after a notification of cancellation has been received by the paid solicitor, the paid solicitor shall tender to the contributor any contribution made and any note or other evidence of indebtedness.

Allowing for ordinary wear and tear or consumption of the goods contemplated by the transaction, within a reasonable time after an agreement or pledge to contribute has been canceled, the contributor upon demand must tender to the paid solicitor any goods or items delivered by the paid solicitor in connection with the contribution but shall not be under obligation to tender at any other place than where the goods or items were delivered. If the paid solicitor fails to demand possession of the goods or items within a reasonable time after cancellation, the goods or items become the property of the contributor without obligation to contribute. For purposes of this subsection (6), forty days is presumed to be a reasonable time.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article added, p. 355, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section R&RE, p. 365, § 4, effective July 1.

6-16-107. Donated tickets - sponsored attendance.

No person, in the course of or in aid of a solicitation, shall represent that a contribution will purchase a ticket or tickets to be donated for use by another, sponsor the attendance of another at an event, or sponsor the receipt of a benefit by another while knowing that the donated tickets or sponsorships will not actually be used or received by the donees or beneficiaries in the quantity represented.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article added, p. 355, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section R&RE, p. 366, § 5, effective July 1.

6-16-108. Publications. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article added, p. 356, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section repealed, p. 367, § 8, effective July 1.

6-16-109. Records - accounts.

During each solicitation campaign, a paid solicitor shall create and maintain, for not less than two years after the completion of such campaign, the following records:

Copies of all written confirmations or any standardized written confirmations provided pursuant to section 6-16-105;

The name and residence address of each employee, agent, or other person involved in the solicitation as is on record at the time of such solicitation;

The locations and account numbers of all bank or other financial institution accounts into which the paid solicitor has deposited receipts from the solicitation;

Records indicating the quantity of donated tickets or sponsorships, as described in section 6-16-107, which were actually used or received by donees or beneficiaries;

A complete record and accounting of the receipts and disbursements of funds derived from any solicitation campaign. Said record and accounting shall clearly identify any person or organization to whom or to which any part of such funds are transferred and shall describe with specificity the purpose for which any expenditure is made and the amount of each expenditure. Funds spent directly for any charitable purpose or transferred to any charitable organization as represented in the solicitations shall be clearly delineated as such.

All written records relating to pitches, sales approaches, or disclosures used during any solicitation campaign and all instructions provided to paid solicitors concerning the content or solicitations;

All contracts or agreements made with charitable organizations or other represented beneficiaries of solicitations; and

For each contribution, records indicating the name and address of the contributor, the amount of the contribution if monetary, and the date of the contribution, together with the name of the individual paid solicitor who solicited the contribution.

Any person involved in solicitations who claims an exemption from the definition of paid solicitor in section 6-16-103 (7) shall maintain records of ruling letters and other communications from the internal revenue service regarding tax-exempt status. Failure to produce such records on written demand of the district attorney pursuant to section 6-16-111 (1)(e) shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption that the person does not have a ruling letter granting tax-exempt status pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 501 (c)(3).

Repealed.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article added, p. 356, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(d), (1)(f), (1)(g), (2), and (3) amended and (1)(h) added, p. 366, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(3) repealed, p. 1247, § 6, effective May 9, 2002.

6-16-110. Charitable sales promotions.

The provisions of this article relating to commercial coventurers and charitable sales promotions shall apply only when a commercial coventurer reasonably expects that more than one-half of all proceeds of a solicitation campaign will be derived from transactions within the state of Colorado.

A commercial coventurer shall disclose in each advertisement for a charitable sales promotion the dollar amount or percent per unit of goods or services purchased or used that will benefit the charitable organization or purpose. If the actual dollar amount or percentage cannot reasonably be determined prior to the final date of the charitable sales promotion, the commercial coventurer shall disclose an estimated dollar amount or percentage. Any such estimate shall be reasonable and shall be based upon all of the relevant facts known to the commercial coventurer regarding the charitable sales promotion.

A commercial entity which purchases at wholesale a product which is created, manufactured, or produced by a charitable organization for resale to the general public as part of the commercial entity's general stock of merchandise shall be exempt from the provisions of this article relating to commercial coventurers and charitable sales promotions.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article added, p. 357, § 1, effective July 1.

6-16-110.5. Secretary of state - dissemination of information - cooperation with other agencies - rules.

The secretary of state shall take steps to:

Publicize the requirements of this article and otherwise assist charitable organizations, professional fundraising consultants, and paid solicitors in complying with this article;

Compile and publish, on an annual basis, the information provided by charitable organizations, professional fundraising consultants, and paid solicitors under this article to assist the public in making informed decisions about charitable solicitation and to assist charitable organizations in making informed decisions about contracting with paid solicitors;

Participate in a national online charity information system as soon as a system is established, if the secretary determines that participation will further advance the purposes of this subsection (1) and subsection (2) of this section.

The secretary of state may exchange with appropriate authorities of this state, any other state, and the United States information with respect to charitable organizations, professional fundraising consultants, commercial coventurers, and paid solicitors.

The secretary of state may promulgate rules as needed for the effective implementation of this article 16, including:

Providing for the extension of filing deadlines;

Providing for the online availability of forms required to be filed pursuant to sections 6-16-104 to 6-16-104.6;

Providing for the electronic filing of required forms, including the acceptance of electronic signatures;

Mandating electronic filing and providing, in the secretary of state's discretion, for exceptions to mandatory electronic filing;

Setting fines for noncompliance with this article or rules promulgated pursuant to this article; and

Providing for the withdrawal of an active registration by a charitable organization, professional fundraising consultant, or paid solicitor.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 1239, § 3, effective May 9, 2002.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 949, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(c) added, p. 1288, § 5, effective June 3.

L. 2008:

(3) amended, p. 807, § 3, effective September 1.

L. 2014:

IP(3) and (3)(e) amended, (HB 14-1206), ch. 118, p. 421, § 5, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

IP(3) amended and (3)(f) added, (HB 17-1158), ch. 160, p. 594, § 4, effective October 1, 2018.